Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1400.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1712-D(b) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1712-D. Credit for qualified film production expenses.* * *(a.1) Qualification.--To qualify for the credit under 12345678910111213141516171819202122 section 1712-D, a ny adult, paid or unpaid, reasonably expected to have direct contact with children during the production of a film, as defined in section 1711-D, shall submit materials consistent with 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344 (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents), if a child is among those individuals employed.(b) Review and approval.--The department shall establish application periods not to exceed 90 days each. All applications received during the application period shall be reviewed and evaluated by the department based on the following criteria:* * *(2.1) The anticipated number of employees under 18 years of age.* * *Section 2. Section 1717-D of the act is amended to read:Section 1717-D. Penalty.A taxpayer which claims a tax credit [and fails to incur the amount of qualified film production expenses agreed to in section 1712-D(c)(3) for a film in that taxable year] shall repay to the Commonwealth the amount of the film production tax credit claimed under this subarticle for the film[.] if:(1) the taxpayer fails to incur the amount of qualified film production expenses agreed to in section 1712-D(c)(3) for a film in that taxable year; or(2) the taxpayer fails to comply with the qualification established in section 1712-D(a.1).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1400PN1608 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627